Utah statutes.
78B-5-808.   Salaries of public officers subject to garnishment.

The state and any subdivision, agency, or institution of the state which has in its possession or under its control any credits or other personal property of, or owing any debt to, the defendant in any action, whether as salary or wages, as a public official or employee may be subject to attachment, garnishment, and execution in accordance with any rights, remedies, and procedures applicable to attachment, garnishment, and execution, respectively, except as provided in Section 78B-5-809.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

